Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1406
Commission; vacancies.

If any vacancy occurs during the term of a member of the commission, the Governor shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term. If the appointment is made when the Legislature is in session, the appointment shall be subject to the approval of a majority of the Legislature. If the appointment is made when the Legislature is not in session, the appointee shall serve with all rights and authority of the office until the approval or disapproval of the appointment is considered by the next session of the Legislature following the appointment.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 9.